Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB2193.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. The act of March 4, 1971 (P.L.6, No.2), known as the Tax Reform Code of 1971, is amended by adding an article to read:ARTICLE XVII-MDEER PROCESSOR'S TAX CREDITSection 1701-M. Scope of article.This article relates to a deer processor's tax credit.Section 1702-M. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this article 123456789101112131415161718192021 shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Accepting registered public charity." An institution that meets the criteria under section 5 of the act of November 26, 1997 (P.L.508, No.55), known as the Institutions of Purely Public Charity Act, and accepts venison as a means of feeding the hungry."Department." The Department of Revenue of the Commonwealth."Pass-through entity." Any of the following:(1) A partnership, limited partnership, limited liability company, business trust or other unincorporated entity that for Federal income tax purposes is taxable as a partnership.(2) A Pennsylvania S corporation."Qualified processing expense." The expense a processor incurs as a result of processing a single deer, from which the meat is being donated for the sole purpose of human consumption."Qualified tax liability."(1) The liability for taxes imposed under Article III, IV or VI III OR IV . (2) The term includes the liability for taxes imposed under Article III on a shareholder of a pass-through entity."Tax credit." The deer processor's tax credit authorized under this article."Taxpayer."(1) An entity subject to tax under Article III, IV or VI III OR IV . (2) The term includes the shareholder, owner or member of a pass-through entity that applies for or receives a tax credit.20260HB2193PN3610 - 2 - <--<--<--<--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Section 1703-M. Tax credit for qualified processing expense.(a) Application.--(1) A taxpayer may apply for a tax credit as provided in this article if the taxpayer incurs a qualified processing expense while donating the taxpayer's service to an individual who wishes to donate all of the consumable venison from a single deer to an accepting registered public charity.(2) By September 15, the taxpayer described in paragraph (1) must submit an application to the department for a qualified processing expense incurred in the taxable year that ended in the prior calendar year.(b) Accountability.--The qualifying processor must retain for recordkeeping purposes each appropriate Pennsylvania Game Commission numbered and issued ear tag that is affixed to each deer being donated.(c) Receipt.--(1) Subject to paragraph (2), a taxpayer that is qualified under subsection (a) shall receive a tax credit for the taxable year in the amount of $100 per deer processed.(2) The maximum tax credit amount which a taxpayer that is qualified under subsection (a) shall receive may not exceed $5,000 for the taxable year.(d) Notification.--By December 15 of the calendar year following the close of the taxable year during which the qualified processing expense was incurred, the department shall notify the taxpayer of the amount of the taxpayer's tax credit approved by the department.Section 1704-M. Carryover, carryback, refund and application of tax credit.(a) Carryover.-- If a taxpayer cannot use the entire amount 20260HB2193PN3610 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 of the tax credit for the taxable year in which the tax credit is first approved, the excess may be carried over to succeeding taxable years and used as a credit against the qualified tax liability of the taxpayer for those taxable years. The following apply to the carryover:(1) Each time that the tax credit is carried over to a succeeding taxable year, it is to be reduced by the amount that was used as a credit during the immediately preceding taxable year.(2) The tax credit may be carried over and applied to succeeding taxable years for no more than 15 FIVE taxable years following the first taxable year for which the taxpayer was entitled to claim the tax credit.(b) Application.--A tax credit approved by the department for a qualified processing expense in a taxable year first shall be applied against the taxpayer's qualified tax liability for the current taxable year as of the date on which the tax credit was approved before the tax credit is applied against any qualified tax liability under subsection (a).(c) No carryback or refund.--A taxpayer is not entitled to carry back or obtain a refund of an unused tax credit.Section 1705-M. Limitation on credits.(a) Total amount.--The total amount of tax credits approved by the department shall not exceed $200,000 in any fiscal year.(b) Allocation of tax credits.--Tax credits under this article shall be provided on a first-come, first-served basis until all annual available tax credits have been allocated.Section 1706-M. Shareholder, owner or member pass-through.(a) Application to Pennsylvania S corporations.--If a Pennsylvania S corporation does not have a qualified tax 20260HB2193PN3610 - 4 - <--<--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 liability against which the tax credit may be applied, a shareholder of the Pennsylvania S corporation is entitled to a tax credit equal to the tax credit determined for the Pennsylvania S corporation for the taxable year multiplied by the percentage of the Pennsylvania S corporation's distributive income to which the shareholder is entitled.(b) Other applications.--If a pass-through entity other than a Pennsylvania S corporation does not have a qualified tax liability against which the tax credit may be applied, an owner or member of the pass-through entity is entitled to a tax credit equal to the tax credit determined for the pass-through entity for the taxable year multiplied by the percentage of the pass-through entities' distributive income to which the owner or member is entitled.(c) Additional credit.--(1) Except as provided in paragraph (2), the tax credit provided under subsection (a) or (b) is in addition to any tax credit to which a shareholder, owner or member of a pass-through entity is otherwise entitled under this article.(2) A pass-through entity and a shareholder, owner or member of a pass-through entity may not claim a tax credit under this article for the same qualified processing expense.SECTION 1706-M. PASS-THROUGH ENTITY.(A) TRANSFER.--IF A PASS-THROUGH ENTITY HAS ANY UNUSED TAX CREDIT, IT MAY ELECT IN WRITING, ACCORDING TO PROCEDURES ESTABLISHED BY THE DEPARTMENT, TO TRANSFER ALL OR A PORTION OF THE CREDIT TO SHAREHOLDERS, MEMBERS OR PARTNERS IN PROPORTION TO THE SHARE OF THE ENTITY'S DISTRIBUTIVE INCOME TO WHICH THE SHAREHOLDER, MEMBER OR PARTNER IS ENTITLED.(B) LIMITATION.--A PASS-THROUGH ENTITY AND A SHAREHOLDER, 20260HB2193PN3610 - 5 - <--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 MEMBER OR PARTNER OF A PASS-THROUGH ENTITY SHALL NOT CLAIM THE CREDIT UNDER SUBSECTION (A) FOR THE SAME QUALIFIED LIABILITY.(C) APPLICATION.--A SHAREHOLDER, MEMBER OR PARTNER OF A PASS-THROUGH ENTITY TO WHOM A CREDIT IS TRANSFERRED UNDER SUBSECTION (A) SHALL IMMEDIATELY CLAIM THE CREDIT IN THE TAXABLE YEAR IN WHICH THE TRANSFER IS MADE. THE SHAREHOLDER, MEMBER OR PARTNER MAY NOT CARRY FORWARD, CARRY BACK, OBTAIN A REFUND OF OR SELL OR ASSIGN THE CREDIT.Section 1707-M. Regulations GUIDELINES . The department shall promulgate regulations necessary MAY DEVELOP WRITTEN GUIDELINES for the implementation and administration of this article.Section 2. This act shall apply to taxable years beginning after December 31, 2024 2025.Section 3. This act shall take effect July 1, 2026, or immediately, whichever is later.20260HB2193PN3610 - 6 - <--<--<--12345678910111213141516